Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB3029.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5494XD (2) 91 sc/ns S.F. _____ H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 9E.7, subsection 5, Code 2026, is amended 1 to read as follows: 2 5. Upon request by a program participant, the assessor or 3 the assessorâs staff recorder shall redact the requestorâs name 4 contained in electronic documents that are displayed for public 5 access through an internet site. The assessor and recorder 6 shall implement and maintain a process to facilitate these 7 requests. A fee shall not be charged for the administration 8 of this subsection. 9